output/hyph-id-orthos-py.pat
% Generated by OrthosColab
\patterns{
a1a
1abs
a1e
a1g
a1hay
a1il
a1in
a1ir
a1is
a1it
al1an
am1an
an1an
a1o
ap1an
ar1an
a1uk.
a1un
a1ur
a1us
a1ut
a1y
1b
ba1ik
ber1
b1r
b1y
1c
cak1an
1d
d1r
e1a
e1g
e1i
ek1an.
e1nga
eng1ab
eng1ak
eng1as
e1ngi
eng1ul
eng1us
e1o
etak1
e1u
e1y
1f
g1ac
g1aku
g1an
g1asu
g1eks
g1g
g1h
g1id
g1im
g1n
g1ob
g1uj
1ha.
1hab
1had
1hah
1hak
1hal
1ham
h1an
1hana
1hap
1har
1has
1hat
1he
h1g
h1i.
1hid
hiper1
1hit
h1n
1ho
h1r
1hu
h1y
i1
ib1an.
if1an
im1an.
1inf
ir1an
1j
ja1uh
1k
k1g
k1n
k1y
1l
la1hi
l1ajar
l1an.
l1g
l1h
l1ism
l1n
l1r
l1y
1m
meng1a
m1n
mper1
m1r
1na
n1an.
1ne
1nga.
ng1ad
ng1ag
1ngah
1ngai
1ngak
ng1al
ng1am
1ngas
1ngat
ng1aw
1nge
ng1em
ng1i
1ngin
1ngo
ng1ole
ng1op
1ngu
ng1ub
ng1um
ng1und
ng1ung
n1h
1ni
n1n
1no
n1r
1nu
1ny
o1a
o1e
o1g
o1hi
o1i
ok1an
ol1an
o1o
o1y
1p
p1g
p1n
1ra
r1an.
1re
r1g
r1h
1ri
r1n
1ro
1ru
r1y
1s
s1an
s1g
s1h
s1n
s1r
1t
t1an
ter1ad
ter1ak
t1g
t1n
u1a
u1e
u1g
uh1
u1i
uk1an.
uk1i.
um1an.
un1an
u1o
up1an
up1i.
ur1an
ut1i.
u1y
1v
1w
wa1ngi
y1h
1z
}
